South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3142.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 56-1-460(A)(1)(c) and (A)(1)(e)(i) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (c) for a third or subsequent offense, fined one thousand dollars, andor imprisoned for up to ninety days or confined to a person's place of residence pursuant to the Home Detention Act for up to ninety days. No portion of a term of imprisonment or confinement under home detention may be suspended by the trial judge except when the court is suspending a term of imprisonment upon successful completion of the terms and conditions of confinement under home detention. For purposes of this item, a person sentenced to confinement pursuant to the "Home Detention Act" is required to pay for the cost of such confinement. (e)(i) A person convicted of a first or second offense of this item, as determined by the records of the department, and who is employed or enrolled in a college or university at any time while the person's driver's license is suspended pursuant to this item, may apply for a route restricted driver's license permitting the person to drive only to and from work or the person's place of education and in the course of the person's employment or education during the period of suspension. The department may issue the route restricted driver's license only upon a showing by the person that the person is employed or enrolled in a college or university and that the person lives furtherfarther than one mile from the person's place of employment or place of education. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----